es: Escala de la motocicleta de juguete: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Otro
th: ของเล่นมอเตอร์ไซค์ ขยายสเกล: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Váha na hračkársku motorku: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Iné
zh-CN: 玩具摩托车扩大规模: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; 其他
da: Skala for legetøjsmotorcykel: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Andet
de: Maßstab des Spielzeugmotorrads: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Мащаб на модел мотоциклет играчка: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Друго
ja: おもちゃのバイク縮尺: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; その他
nb: Skala for lekemotorsykkel: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Annet
zh-TW: 玩具摩托車比例: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; 其他
vi: Mô hình xe máy đồ chơi: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Khác
hr-HR: Razmjer motocikla igračke: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Ostalo
ro-RO: Scara motocicletei de jucărie: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Altele
lt-LT: Žaislinis motociklas: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Kita
pl: Skala zabawkowego motocykla: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Inne
ru: Масштаб игрушечного мотоцикла: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Другое
ko: 장난감 오토바이 축척: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; 기타
sv: Leksaksmotorcykel – skala: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Övrigt
fr: Échelle de la moto jouet: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Autre
pt-PT: Escala da motocicleta de brinquedo: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Outro
en: Toy motorcycle scale: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Other
el: Κλίμακα παιχνιδιού μοτοσικλέτας: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Άλλο
cs: Měřítko modelu motocyklu: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Jiné
tr: Oyuncak motosiklet ölçeği: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Diğer
fi: Lelumoottoripyörän mittakaava: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Muu
it: Scala della moto giocattolo: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Altro
nl: Speelgoedmotor schaal: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Overig
sl-SI: Merilo igralnega motorja: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Drugo
pt-BR: Motocicleta de brinquedo escala: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Outros
hu: Játékmotor skálázás: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:36; 1:43; 1:50; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Egyéb